tests/verbs.yaml
"Verb giig":
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><opt> : giiga
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><imfr> : giigaasa
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><prf> : giigabeakka
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><intr><prf> : giigabeikkii
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><prf> : giigadasa
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><intr><prf> : giigadii
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><imfr> : giigakka
    giig<v><tv><p2><sing><intr><imfr> : giigay
    giig<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><prf> : giigaasu
    giig<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><intr><prf> : giigabeekkee
    giig<v><tv><p3><sing><neg><fem><prf> : giigabeukku
    giig<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><intr><prf> : giigadee
    giig<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><imfr> : giigawsu
    giig<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><intr><imfr> : giigay
    giig<v><tv><intr><fut> : giiganne
    giig<v><tv><fut> : giigana
    giig<v><tv><shortcnvb><p1><sing> : giiga
    giig<v><tv><shortcnvb><p2><sing> : giiga
    giig<v><tv><shortcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : giiga
    giig<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><sing> : giigada
    giig<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><sing> : giigada
    giig<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : giigada
    giig<v><tv><simu><p1><sing> : giigaydaa
    giig<v><tv><simu><p2><sing> : giigaydaa
    giig<v><tv><simu><p3><sing><fem> : giigaydaa
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : giigagaa
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : giigagaakko
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : giigagaan
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : giigagaani
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : giigagaappe
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : giigagaara
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : giigagaassi
    giig<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : giigagaa
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><intr><prf> : giigissibeennee
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><neg><prf>  : giigissibeenna
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><intr><prf> : giigissibeokkonaa
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><neg><prf> : giigissibeokkona
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><prf> : giigissidee
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><intr><prf> : giigissidonaa
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><prf> : giigissidosona
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : giigissii
    giig<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : giigissiis

 "Verb gilqq":
    gilqq<v><iv><inf><abs><sg> : gilqqanaa
    gilqq<v><iv><inf><obl> : gilqqana
    gilqq<v><iv><p1><plr><imfr> : gilqqeettees
    gilqq<v><iv><p1><plr><neg><imfr> : gilqqettenna
    gilqq<v><iv><p1><plr><neg><intr><imfr> : gilqqettennee
    gilqq<v><iv><p2><plr><imfr> : gilqqeeta

 "Verb gilqq":
    gish<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><intr><imfr> : gishissii
    gish<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : gishissiis
    gish<v><tv><cau><p3><sing><masc><prf> : gishissiisi
    gish<v><tv><cau><p3><plr><intr><imfr> : gishissiyonaa
    gish<v><tv><cau><shortcnvb><p1><plr> : gishissi
    gish<v><tv><cau><shortcnvb><p2><plr> : gishissi
    gish<v><tv><cau><shortcnvb><p3><sing><masc> : gishissi
    gish<v><tv><cau><shortcnvb><p3><plr> : gishissi
    gish<v><tv><cau><longcnvb><p1><plr> : gishissidi
    gish<v><tv><cau><longcnvb><p2><plr> : gishissidi
    gish<v><tv><cau><longcnvb><p3><sing><masc> : gishissidi
    gish<v><tv><cau><longcnvb><p3><plr> : gishissidi
    gish<v><tv><cau><simu><p1><plr> : gishissiiddi
    gish<v><tv><cau><simu><p2><plr> : gishissiiddi
    gish<v><tv><cau><simu><p3><sing><masc> : gishissiiddi
    gish<v><tv><cau><simu><p3><plr> : gishissiiddi
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : gishissidagaa
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : gishissidagaakko
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : gishissidagaan
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ni<post> : gishissidagaani
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : gishissidagaappe
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : gishissidagaara
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : gishissidagaassi
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : gishissidagaa
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gishissidagaadaani
    gish<v><tv><cau><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gishissidagaadan

 "Verb gitat":
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ra<post> : gitatissiyagaara
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : gitatissiyagaassi
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl> : gitatissiyagaa
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gitatissiyagaadaani
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gitatissiyagaadan
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : gitatissiyagee
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : gitatissiyagee
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : gitatissiyageeta
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+kko<post> : gitatissiyageetukko
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : gitatissiyageetun
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : gitatissiyageetuni
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : gitatissiyageetuppe
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : gitatissiyageetura
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : gitatissiyageetussi
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : gitatissiyageetu
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gitatissiyageetudaani
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gitatissiyageetudan
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><nom> : gitatissiyageeti
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : gitatissiyageetee
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : gitatissiyageetoo
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : gitatissiyagoo
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : gitatissiyara
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : gitatissiyaree
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : gitatissiyarikko
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : gitatissiyarin
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : gitatissiyarini
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : gitatissiyarippe
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ra<post> : gitatissiyarira
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ssi<post> : gitatissiyarissi
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl> : gitatissiyari
    gitat<v><iv><cau><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+daani<post> : gitatissiyaridaani

 "Verb gixx":
    gixx<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : gixxaas
    gixx<v><tv><p1><sing><prf> : gixxaasi
    gixx<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><intr><prf> : gixxabeikkinaa
    gixx<v><tv><p1><sing><neg><prf> : gixxabeikke
    gixx<v><tv><p1><sing><imfr> : gixxays
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><opt> : gixxa
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><imfr> : gixxaasa
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><prf> : gixxabeakka
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><intr><prf> : gixxabeikkii
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><prf> : gixxadasa
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><intr><prf> : gixxadii
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><neg><imfr> : gixxakka
    gixx<v><tv><p2><sing><intr><imfr> : gixxay
    gixx<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><prf> : gixxaasu
    gixx<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><neg><intr><prf> : gixxabeekkee
    gixx<v><tv><p3><sing><neg><fem><prf> : gixxabeukku
    gixx<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><intr><prf> : gixxadee
    gixx<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><imfr> : gixxawsu
    gixx<v><tv><p3><sing><fem><intr><imfr> : gixxay
    gixx<v><tv><intr><fut> : gixxanne
    gixx<v><tv><fut> : gixxana
    gixx<v><tv><shortcnvb><p1><sing> : gixxa
    gixx<v><tv><shortcnvb><p2><sing> : gixxa
    gixx<v><tv><shortcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : gixxa
    gixx<v><tv><longcnvb><p1><sing> : gixxada
    gixx<v><tv><longcnvb><p2><sing> : gixxada
    gixx<v><tv><longcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : gixxada
    gixx<v><tv><simu><p1><sing> : gixxaydaa
    gixx<v><tv><simu><p2><sing> : gixxaydaa
    gixx<v><tv><simu><p3><sing><fem> : gixxaydaa
    gixx<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><abs> : gixxagaa
    gixx<v><tv><rel><prf><nsub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+kko<post> : gixxagaakko

 "Verb gooy":
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gooyiyagaadan
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><nom> : gooyiyagee
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><inter> : gooyiyagee
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><abs> : gooyiyageeta
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+kko<post> : gooyiyageetukko
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : gooyiyageetun
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ni<post> : gooyiyageetuni
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : gooyiyageetuppe
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : gooyiyageetura
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : gooyiyageetussi
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl> : gooyiyageetu
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gooyiyageetudaani
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gooyiyageetudan
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><nom> : gooyiyageeti
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><inter> : gooyiyageetee
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><voc> : gooyiyageetoo
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><masc><voc> : gooyiyagoo
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><nom> : gooyiyara
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><voc> : gooyiyaree
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+kko<post> : gooyiyarikko
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : gooyiyarin
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ni<post> : gooyiyarini
    gooy<v><iv><rel><impf><sub><nmlz><sing><fem><obl>+ppe<post> : gooyiyarippe

 "Verb gitay":
    gitay<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ppe<post> : gitayidogeetuppe
    gitay<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ra<post> : gitayidogeetura
    gitay<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+ssi<post> : gitayidogeetussi
    gitay<v><tv><rel><prf><sub><nmlz><plr><masc><obl>+daani<post> : gitayidogeetudaani
 
"Verb hallixx":
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><fut> : hallixissana
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><shortcnvb><p1><sing> : hallixissa
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><shortcnvb><p2><sing> : hallixissa
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><shortcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : hallixissa
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><longcnvb><p1><sing> : hallixissada
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><longcnvb><p2><sing> : hallixissada
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><longcnvb><p3><sing><fem> : hallixissada
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><simu><p1><sing> : hallixissaydaa
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><simu><p2><sing> : hallixissaydaa
    hallixx<v><iv><cau><simu><p3><sing><fem> : hallixissaydaa
